test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AH_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - dah - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AH

     dah+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: dah
     dah+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dahga
     dah+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dah
     dah+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dahgáng
     dah+V+DIRECT+PAST: dahgán
     dah+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dahgáa
     dah+V+INDIRECT+PAST: dahgáan
     dah+V+RELATIVE: dahs
     dah+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: dahgáas
     dah+V+NON_FACTIVE: daháng
     dah+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: dahgáa.ang
     dah+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dahgáng
     dah+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dahgánggang
     dah+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: dahgangáng
     dah+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dahgíinii
     dah+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dahgáangaa
     dah+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dahgáangaan
     dah+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: dahäsáa
     dah+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: dahäs
     dah+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: dahäsáang
     dah+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: dahäsga
     dah+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: dahäsáas
     dah+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: dahäsáa.ang
     dah+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: daháng k̲asa'áa
     dah+V+NEAR+FUTURE: daháng k̲asa'áang
     dah+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: daháng k̲asaasdláa
     dah+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: daháng k̲asaasdláang
     dah+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dah'úuj
     dah+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dah'úujang
     dah+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: dahäsáa'uujang
     dah+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: dah'us
     dah+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dah'ujáa
     dah+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'úujaangaa
     dah+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: dahäsáa'us
     dah+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: dah'ahlánggang
     dah+V+CERTAIN+PAST: dah'ahlánggan
     dah+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'ahlánggiinii
     dah+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: dahäsáa'ahlans
     dah+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: dah'ahláns
     dah+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: dahgáa'ahlang
     dah+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: dahgáa'ahlanggaa
     dah+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: dahgáa'ahlanggang
     dah+V+REFLEXIVE: dah'ahl
     dah+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: dahäséehl
     dah+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: dah'úu
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dah'wáa
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dah'wáa
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dah'wáang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: dah'wägán
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dah'áawaa
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: dah'áawaan
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: dah'wáas
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: dah'áawaas
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: dah'wáa.ang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: dah'áawaa.ang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dahgáng'waa
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dahgáng'waang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: dahgáng'waa.ang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'wägíinii
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'wägáangaa
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'wägáangaan
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: dah'wáaäsaa
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: dah'wáaäs
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: dah'wáaäsaang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: dah'wáaäsga
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: dah'wáaäsaas
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: dah'wáaäsaa.ang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: dah'wáa.ang k̲asa'áa
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: dah'wáa.ang k̲asa'áang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dah'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dah'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dah'wáa'uuj
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dah'wáa'uujang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: dah'wáaäsaa'uujang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: dah'wáa'us
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dah'wáa'ujaa
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'wáa'uujaangaa
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: dah'wáaäsaa'us
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: dah'wáa'ahlanggang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: dah'wáa'ahlanggan
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'wáa'ahlanggiinii
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: dah'wáaäsaa'ahlans
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: dah'wáa'ahlans
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: dah'áawaa'ahlang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: dah'áawaa'ahlanggaa
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: dah'áawaa'ahlanggang
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: dah'wáa'ahl
     dah+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: dah'wáaäseehl
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: dah'áng
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dah'ángga
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dah'áng
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dah'ánggang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: dah'ánggan
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dah'áangaa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: dah'áangaan
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: dah'áns
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: dah'áangaas
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: dah'angáng
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: dah'áangaa.ang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dah'ánggang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dahgáng'anggang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: dahgáng'angang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'ánggiinii
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'ánggaangaa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'ánggaangaan
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: dah'ángäsaa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: dah'ángäs
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: dah'ángäsaang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: dah'ángäsga
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: dah'ángäsaas
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: dah'ángäsaa.ang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: daháng k̲asaa'áng
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: daháng k̲asaa'ánggang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: daháng k̲asaasdlä'áng
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: daháng k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dah'áng'uuj
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dah'áng'uujang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: dah'ángäsaa'uujang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: dah'áng'us
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dah'áng'ujaa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'áng'uujaangaa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: dah'ángäsaa'us
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: dah'áang'ahlanggang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: dah'áang'ahlanggan
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'áang'ahlanggiinii
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: dah'ángäsaa'ahlans
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: dah'áang'ahlans
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: dah'áangaa'ahlang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: dah'áangaa'ahlanggaa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: dah'áangaa'ahlanggang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: dah'áang'ahl
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: dah'ángäseehl
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: dah'áng'uu
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dah'áng'waa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dah'áng'waa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dah'áng'waang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: dah'áng'wägan
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dah'áng'aawaa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: dah'áng'aawaan
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: dah'áng'waas
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: dah'áng'aawaas
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: dah'áng'waa.ang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: dah'áng'aawaa.ang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dahgáng'ang'waa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dahgáng'ang'waang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: dahgáng'ang'waa.ang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'áng'wägiinii
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'áng'wägaangaa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'áng'wägaangaan
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: dah'áng'waaäsaa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: dah'áng'waaäs
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: dah'áng'waaäsaang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: dah'áng'waaäsga
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: dah'áng'waaäsaas
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: dah'áng'waaäsaa.ang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: dah'wáa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: dah'wáa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dah'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dah'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dah'áng'waa'uuj
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dah'áng'waa'uujang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: dah'áng'waaäsaa'uujang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: dah'áng'waa'us
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dah'áng'waa'ujaa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'áng'waa'uujaangaa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: dah'áng'waaäsaa'us
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: dah'áng'waa'ahlanggang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: dah'áng'waa'ahlanggan
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: dah'áng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: dah'áng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: dah'áng'waa'ahlans
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: dah'áng'aawaa'ahlang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: dah'áng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: dah'áng'aawaa'ahlanggang
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: dah'áng'waa'ahl
     dah+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: dah'áng'waaäseehl
